Utah statutes.
34A-6-109.   Educational and training programs.

(1)  The division, after consultation with other appropriate agencies, shall conduct, directly or by assistance:

(a)  educational programs to provide an adequate supply of qualified personnel to carry out the purpose of this chapter; and

(b)  informational programs on the importance of adequate safety and health equipment.

(2)  The division is authorized to conduct, directly or by assistance, training for personnel engaged in work related to its responsibilities under this chapter.

(3)  The division shall:

(a)  establish and supervise programs for the education and training of employers and employees for recognition, avoidance, and prevention of unsafe or unhealthful working conditions;

(b)  consult and advise employers and employees about effective means for prevention of any work-related injury or occupational disease; and

(c)  provide safety and health workplace surveys.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 375, 1997 General Session

